District of Columbia statutes.
47-1316

Errors in computation not to affect sales.

No sale of any real property for taxes shall be impaired or made void by reason of any error of the proper officers in making a computation of the amount of taxes due, the expenses attendant on the advertisement and sale, or of the purchase money and the interest thereon, notwithstanding the sum erroneously computed may have been paid by the purchaser, his heirs or assigns; but all such sales and the deeds which may be granted on the certificates then issued shall be valid and binding as if no such error had been made.

R.S., D.C., § 173
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-1316.
1973 Ed., § 47-1015.